test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-3lex_uaivat_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - uáivát+v1: # From literal sources
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Nom: uáivát
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Gen: uáivát
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Acc: uáivát
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Ill: uáivátân 
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Loc: uáivátist 
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Com: uáivátáin
    uáivát+v1+N+Sg+Abe: uáiváttáá
    uáivát+v1+N+Ess:    uáiváttin
    uáivát+v1+N+Par:    uáiváttid
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Nom: uáiváteh
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Gen: uáivátij
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Acc: uáivátijd
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Ill: uáivátáid 
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Loc: uáivátijn
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Com: [uáivátijguin, uáivátijgijn]
    uáivát+v1+N+Pl+Abe: uáivátijttáá

  Noun - uáivát+v2: # According to Ella Sarre 
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Nom: uáivát
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Gen: uáiváát
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Acc: uáiváát
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Ill: uáiváátân
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Loc: uáivááttist
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Com: uáivááttáin
    uáivát+v2+N+Sg+Abe: uáivááttáá
    uáivát+v2+N+Ess: uáivááttin
    uáivát+v2+N+Par: uáivááttid
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Nom: uáiváátteh
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Gen: uáivááttij
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Acc: uáivááttijd
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Ill: uáivááttáid
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Loc: uáivááttijn
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Com: [uáivááttijguin, uáivááttijgijn]
    uáivát+v2+N+Pl+Abe: uáivááttijttáá

  Noun - uáivát+v3: # According to Elsa Väisänen 
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Nom: uáivát
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Gen: uáivát
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Acc: uáivát
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Ill: uáiváttân
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Loc: uáiváttist
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Com: uáiváttáin
    uáivát+v3+N+Sg+Abe: uáiváttáá
    uáivát+v3+N+Ess: uáiváttin
    uáivát+v3+N+Par: uáiváttid
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Nom: uáivátteh
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Gen: uáiváttij
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Acc: uáiváttijd
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Ill: uáiváttáid
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Loc: uáiváttijn
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Com: [uáiváttijguin, uáiváttijgijn]
    uáivát+v3+N+Pl+Abe: uáiváttijttáá


 # A rare word, inflection problematic.
 # Reverse dictionary: uáivát: lok. uáivááttist
 # How many yamls / lexicons? 
